Connecticut, session 2026, HB05481.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
Social Services shall develop a pilot program to identify and utilize a
short-term hospital special hospice, licensed pursuant to section 19a-491
of the general statutes, to treat Medicaid patients with advanced illness
who qualify for hospice and are clinically complex, high-acuity
individuals that cannot be safely managed at home or in a skilled
nursing facility, provided that such short-term hospital special hospice
does not practice outside of the scope of its license without obtaining the
appropriate license for the provision of care for such patients. Not later
than January 15, 2027, the commissioner or the commissioner's
designee, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, shall submit a report to the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
appropriations, human services and public health on the development
of the pilot program, including any potential savings that may be
achieved and recommendations for funding or statutory changes.
(b) Within funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the

Substitute House Bill No. 5481
Department of Social Services shall implement such pilot program not
later than December 30, 2027.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-71 2 of 2